South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3264.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 3, Chapter 1, Title 59 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 59-1-444.  (A) As used in this section, "media literacy" means: (1) the ability of an individual to access, analyze, evaluate, and participate with all forms of media, such as: (a) news in print; and (b) social media content, such as images, text, video, and other media content; (2) the ability of an individual to recognize bias and stereotypes in media messages; (3) the foundational skills of digital citizenship and internet safety; and (4) in the classroom, media literacy includes integrating the process of critical analysis of media messages into the daily classroom curricula. (B) The State Department of Education shall establish the "Media Literacy and Critical Thinking" pilot program which the department shall implement and administer during the 2026-2027 and 2027-2028 School Years. (C) Under the pilot program, the department shall select seven school districts in diverse parts of the State to participate in the pilot program and from which to study data related to the outcomes of the pilot program in the seven pilot sites. (D) A pilot program site shall: (1) address each component of media literacy; (2) develop successful strategies for student learning within the daily classroom curricula in all grades or for a selected preschool to grade twelve level; (3) identify high-quality resources for such pilot program; and (4) demonstrate and report how such site addresses the following in the classroom: (a) news content literacy, which is the ability to access, analyze, evaluate, and distinguish verified information from opinion and propaganda and the opportunity to practice verification; (b) visual literacy, which is the ability to find, interpret, and evaluate images and visual media such as photographs, videos, illustrations, drawings, maps, diagrams, and advertisements; (c) digital fluency, which is the ability to understand and follow the norms of safe and responsible technology use and how media influences attitudes and behaviors; and (d) digital literacy, which is the ability to be technically fluent and able to make informed decisions about content encountered online, recognize how networked technology affects behavior and perception, and create and effectively communicate with digital media tools. (E) Before August 1, 2028, each pilot program site shall submit a report to the department describing the implementation of and the information gained from the pilot program. (F) Before January 1, 2029, the department shall compile the reports submitted from the pilot program sites and submit a summary report to the House Education and Public Works Committee and the Senate Education Committee containing at least the following information: (1) qualitative and quantitative insights on how the pilot program sites addressed media literacy; (2) a compendium of high-quality strategies and resources used by educators; (3) any professional development used or required; (4) recommendations about which facilities, instructional materials, and technologies are needed to implement a media literacy and critical thinking program statewide; (5) exploration of additional policy, administrative mechanisms, and legislative recommendations for implementing best practices and standards statewide; and (6) a draft of proposed clear, inclusive media literacy and critical thinking state standards for preschool to grade twelve, compiled by drawing from key media literacy skills and competencies in existing state standards and from the pilot program results. (G) Standards developed under this section must be included for consideration by the state standards review immediately following the termination of the pilot program. (H) The media literacy and critical thinking pilot program shall terminate on June 30, 2026, unless continued, expanded, or both, by the General Assembly. (I) Notwithstanding subsection (B), the department is required to establish the pilot program under this section only if the General Assembly appropriates money specifically for that purpose. If the General Assembly does not appropriate money specifically for that purpose, the department may, but is not required to, establish the pilot program under this section using other appropriations available for that purpose. (J) The department shall adopt rules necessary to implement this section. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----